Utah statutes.
31A-4-107.5.   Penalty for failure of a regulated health insurance entity to fulfill duties related to state claims for Medicaid payment or recovery.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "regulated health insurance entity" means a health insurance entity, as defined in Section 26-19-2, that is subject to regulation by the department.

(2)  If a regulated health insurance entity fails to comply with the provisions of Section 26-19-4.7:

(a)  the commissioner may revoke or suspend, in whole or in part, a license, certificate of authority, registration, or other authority that is granted by the commissioner to the regulated health insurance entity; and

(b)  the regulated health insurance entity is subject to the penalties and procedures provided for in Section 31A-2-308.



Enacted by Chapter 64, 2007 General Session

